Hawaii statutes.
§46-15.2 Housing; additional county powers.
In addition and supplemental to the powers granted to counties by section
46-15.1, a county shall have and may exercise any of the following powers:

(1) To provide assistance and aid to persons of low-
and moderate-income in acquiring housing by:

(A) Providing loans secured by a mortgage;

(B) Acquiring the loans from private lenders
where the county has made advance commitment to acquire the loans; and

(C) Making and executing contracts with
private lenders or a public agency for the origination and servicing of the
loans and paying the reasonable value of the services;

(2) In connection with the exercise of any powers
granted under this section or section 46-15.1, to establish one or more loan
programs and to issue bonds under chapter 47 or 49 to provide moneys to carry
out the purposes of this section or section 46-15.1; provided that:

(A) If bonds are issued pursuant to chapter
47 to finance one or more loan programs, the county may establish qualifications
for the program or programs as it deems appropriate;

(B) If bonds are issued pursuant to chapter
49 to finance one or more loan programs, the loan program or programs shall
comply with part III, subpart B of chapter 201H, to the extent applicable;

(C) If bonds are issued pursuant to section
47-4 or chapter 49, any loan program established pursuant to this section or
any county-owned dwelling units constructed under section 46-15.1 shall be and
constitute an "undertaking" under section 49‑1 and chapter 49
shall apply to the loan program or county-owned dwelling units to the extent
applicable;

(D) In connection with the establishment of
any loan program pursuant to this section, a county may employ financial
consultants, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, and other
consultants as may be required in the judgment of the county and fix and pay
their compensation from funds available to the county therefor;

(E) Notwithstanding any limitation otherwise
established by law, with respect to the rate of interest on any loan made under
any loan program established pursuant to this section, the loan may bear a rate
or rates of interest per year as the county shall determine; provided that no
loan made from the proceeds of any bonds of the county shall be under terms or
conditions that would cause the interest on the bonds to be deemed subject to
income taxation by the United States;

(F) Notwithstanding any limitation otherwise
established by law, with respect to the amount of compensation permitted to be
paid for the servicing of loans made under any loan program established
pursuant to this section, a county may fix any reasonable compensation as the
county may determine;

(G) Notwithstanding the requirement of any
other law, a county may establish separate funds and accounts with respect to
bonds issued pursuant to chapter 47 or 49 to provide moneys to carry out the
purposes of this section or section 46-15.1 as the county may deem appropriate;

(H) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter
47 or 49 or of any other law, but subject to the limitations of the state
constitution, bonds issued to provide moneys to carry out the purposes of this
section or section 46-15.1 may be sold at public or private sale at a price;
may bear interest at a rate or rates per year; may be payable at a time or
times; may mature at a time or times; may be made redeemable before maturity at
the option of the county, the holder, or both, at a price or prices and upon
terms and conditions; and may be issued in coupon or registered form, or both,
as the county may determine;

(I) If deemed necessary or advisable, the
county may designate a national or state bank or trust company within or
without the State to serve as trustee for the holders of bonds issued to
provide moneys to carry out the purposes of this section or section 46-15.1,
and enter into a trust indenture, trust agreement, or indenture of mortgage
with the trustee whereby the trustee may be authorized to receive and receipt
for, hold, and administer the proceeds of the bonds and to apply the proceeds
to the purposes for which the bonds are issued, or to receive and receipt for,
hold, and administer the revenues and other receipts derived by the county from
the application of the proceeds of the bonds and to apply the revenues and
receipts to the payment of the principal of, or interest on the bonds, or
both. Any trust indenture, trust agreement, or indenture of mortgage entered
into with the trustee may contain any covenants and provisions as may be deemed
necessary, convenient, or desirable by the county to secure the bonds. The
county may pledge and assign to the trustee any agreements related to the
application of the proceeds of the bonds and the rights of the county
thereunder, including the rights to revenues and receipts derived thereunder.
Upon appointment of the trustee, the director of finance of the county may
elect not to serve as fiscal agent for the payment of the principal and
interest, and for the purchase, registration, transfer, exchange, and
redemption, of the bonds; or may elect to limit the functions the director of
finance performs as a fiscal agent; and may appoint a trustee to serve as the
fiscal agent; and may authorize and empower the trustee to perform the
functions with respect to payment, purchase, registration, transfer, exchange,
and redemption, as the director of finance deems necessary, advisable, or
expedient, including without limitation the holding of the bonds and coupons
that have been paid and the supervision and conduction or the destruction
thereof in accordance with law;

(J) If a trustee is not appointed to collect,
hold, and administer the proceeds of bonds issued to provide moneys to carry
out the purposes of this section or section 46-15.1, or the revenues and receipts
derived by the county from the application of the proceeds of the bonds, as
provided in subparagraph (I), the director of finance of the county may hold
the proceeds or revenues and receipts in a separate account in the treasury of
the county, to be applied solely to the carrying out of the ordinance, trust
indenture, trust agreement, or indenture of mortgage, if any, authorizing or
securing the bonds; and

(K) Any law to the contrary notwithstanding,
the investment of funds held in reserves and sinking funds related to bonds
issued to provide moneys to carry out the purposes of this section or section
46-15.1 shall comply with section 201H-77; provided that any investment that
requires approval by the county council pursuant to section 46-48 or 46-50 shall
first be approved by the county council;

(3) To acquire policies of insurance and enter into
banking arrangements as the county may deem necessary to better secure bonds
issued to provide money to carry out the purposes of this section or section
46-15.1, including without limitation contracting for a support facility or
facilities as may be necessary with respect to bonds issued with a right of the
holders to put the bonds and contracting for interest rate swaps; and

(4) To do any and all other things necessary or
appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers granted in
section 46-15.1 and this section. [L 1982, c 284, §1; am L 1983, c 156, §1; am
L 1987, c 80, §2; am L 1990, c 34, §4; am L 1997, c 350, §7; am L 2007, c 37,
§2 and c 249, §9]

Note

L 1997, c 350, §15 purports to amend this section.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next